Rhode Island, session 2025, SB394.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 16-87-2 and 16-87-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-87 entitled
"Rhode Island Prekindergarten Education Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
16-87-2. Findings.
(a) The general assembly hereby finds that attending high quality early childhood education
programs helps children develop important social and cognitive skills and knowledge that prepares
children to succeed in school. Research has shown long-lasting benefits for children who participate
in very high quality, educationally focused early childhood programs. The benefits to children can
also generate substantial government cost savings, including reduced need for special education
services, reduced need for cash assistance and other public benefits, and reduced rates of
incarceration.
(b) The general assembly finds that there are substantial numbers of children in Rhode
Island entering kindergarten who are not adequately prepared to succeed in school. Early school
failure may ultimately contribute to such children dropping out of school at an early age, failing to
achieve their full potential, becoming dependent upon public assistance, or becoming involved in
criminal activities.
(c) Furthermore, the general assembly finds that there is an existing infrastructure of early
childhood programs in Rhode Island serving preschool age children in full-day and half-day
programs that is supported through state and federal investments in child care, Head Start and

special education. It is the goal of the general assembly to support a system of publicly-funded,
high quality prekindergarten education programs that are operated through a diverse delivery
network, including child care, Head Start and public school districts.
(d) By enacting this law, the general assembly acknowledges the need to adequately
prepare all children to succeed in school by providing access to publicly-funded high quality
prekindergarten education programs for all children ages three (3) and four (4) and to sustain and
expand access to high-quality early care and education programs for infants and toddlers under age
three (3).
16-87-4. Early childhood workforce development.
(a) The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall work with
other state departments and private philanthropy to establish the department of human services to
sustain and expand the T.E.A.C.H. Early Childhood program, a statewide, comprehensive,
research-based early childhood workforce development scholarship program to expand the number
of early childhood educators who have an associate’s or bachelor’s degree in early childhood
education and who work with children from birth to age five (5).
(b)(1) In furtherance of the goals set forth in this chapter, no later than January 1, 2023, the
governor’s workforce board shall convene a working group comprised of representatives from the
department of elementary and secondary education, department of human services, office of the
postsecondary commissioner, the RI early learning council, organized labor, and early childhood
education industry employers, whose purpose shall be to identify barriers to entry into the early
childhood education workforce, and to design accessible and accelerated pathways into the
workforce, including, but not limited to, registered apprenticeships and postsecondary credit for
prior work experience.
(2) No later than April 1, 2023, the working group shall provide the general assembly with
recommendations for addressing the barriers to workforce entry and implementing the solutions
identified by the working group; the recommendations shall outline any administrative and
legislative action that would be required by participating agencies to implement the
recommendations.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-87 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Prekindergarten
Education Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-87-8. Prekindergarten implementation and expansion.
(a) The state-managed prekindergarten program model shall be sustained and, as funds are
available, expanded in a mixed-delivery system that includes Head Start programs, local education
agencies, licensed center-based child care providers, and licensed family child care providers or
LC000719 - Page 2 of 5

family child care networks in order that no less than seventy percent (70%) of all children ages
three (3) and four (4) are enrolled in high-quality prekindergarten options.
(b) The department of elementary and secondary education is hereby authorized to
promulgate and adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of high-quality prekindergarten
options.
(c) Research-based quality standards shall be defined in rules and regulations promulgated
by the department and shall meet or exceed the recommended quality standards for state preschool
programs outlined by the National Institute for Early Education Research and/or the federal Head
Start Performance Standards. Quality standards shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Teacher education and certification;
(2) Class size and staff ratios;
(3) Learning time;
(4) Developmentally appropriate, evidence-based learning standards;
(5) Curriculum prioritizing developmentally appropriate, play-based learning;
(6) Access, inclusion and support for students with special needs, including a system to
ensure delivery of high-quality, inclusive early education services required by the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act to children with developmental delays and disabilities who are enrolled
in community-based programs which may or may not be located in the same municipality where
the child lives;
(7) Support for English language learners;
(8) Professional development;
(9) Child assessments; and
(10) Observations and coaching to improve practice.
(d) To whatever extent deemed appropriate and efficient by the department, quality
standards may be differentiated by prekindergarten education setting and include federal support
and oversight for the Head Start Performance Standards, such that every provider in a mixed-
delivery model is able and expected to meet research-based quality standards.
(e) Funds to sustain and expand prekindergarten and Head Start shall be allocated to ensure
teacher wages and benefits are competitive with similarly qualified kindergarten teacher wages and
benefits.
(f) Commencing with fiscal year 2026 and every fiscal year thereafter, any increase by the
general assembly in funding allocated for expansion of the Rhode Island prekindergarten program
shall include a thirty percent (30%) set aside of funding to be administered by the department of
human services to sustain and expand access to high-quality child care and early learning programs
LC000719 - Page 3 of 5

for infants and toddlers, including Early Head Start.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000719
========
LC000719 - Page 4 of 5